Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.055

Judicial appointment of successor guardian or successor conservator.

(1) The court at any time may appoint a successor guardian or successor conservator to serve immediately or when a designated event occurs.

(2) A person entitled under RCW 11.130.190 or 11.130.270 to petition the court to appoint a guardian may petition the court to appoint a successor guardian. A person entitled under RCW 11.130.365 to petition the court to appoint a conservator may petition the court to appoint a successor conservator.

(3) A successor guardian or successor conservator appointed to serve when a designated event occurs may act as guardian or conservator when:

(a) The event occurs; and

(b) The successor complies with RCW 11.130.040.

(4) A successor guardian or successor conservator has the predecessor's powers unless otherwise provided by the court.

[ 2019 c 437 s 111.]